Maine, session 132, LD1147.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2001-A, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 452, Pt. N, §2 and
affected by Pt. X, §2, is amended to read:
1. Display or carrying prohibited. A person may not, unless excepted by a provision
of law, intentionally or knowingly:
A. Display in a threatening manner a firearm, slungshot, knuckles, bowie knife, dirk,
stiletto or other dangerous or deadly weapon usually employed in the attack on or
defense of a person; or
B. Wear under the person's clothes or conceal about the person's person a firearm,
slungshot, knuckles, bowie knife, dirk, stiletto or other dangerous or deadly weapon
usually employed in the attack on or defense of a person.